Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB844.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 3, 1959 (P.L.1688, No.621), known as the Housing Finance Agency Law, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE III-BHOUSING CONSTRUCTION LOAN PROGRAMSection 301-B. Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Eligible builder." A builder that is engaged in the construction of new housing units, has a primary place of business located in this Commonwealth and has conducted business in this Commonwealth for no less than three years."Fund." The Housing Construction Loan Fund established under section 304-B(a)."Program." The Housing Construction Loan Program established under section 302-B(a).Section 302-B. Establishment and administration of Housing Construction Loan Program . (a) Establishment.--The Housing Construction Loan Program is established within the agency for the purposes specified in this article. An eligible builder or l ow-income persons or families and moderate income persons or families may apply for a loan under the program in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the agency.(b) Administration.--20250HB0844PN0874 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829303132 (1) The agency may issue loans under the program to any of the following in accordance with the agency's rules and regulations:(i) An eligible builder for the construction of new housing units for sale to low-income persons or families and moderate-income persons or families . (ii) L ow-income persons or families and moderate- income persons or families for the long-term financing of new housing units constructed by an eligible builder.(2) The agency may not issue a loan under the program in excess of 100% of the total project cost.(3) When a loan under the program is outstanding, the agency shall, prior to the approval of sale by the eligible builder or subsequent resale, ensure that the sale or resale is to low-income persons or families and moderate-income persons or families.(4) The agency may set the interest rate for a loan issued under the program in a manner consistent with the agency's cost of borrowing money, cost of operation and the agency's duty to the agency's bondholders. Regarding the issuance of a loan under the program and the commitments of the loan, in addition to the interest authorized under this paragraph, the agency may impose and collect fees and charges for the reimbursement of the agency's financing costs, service charges, insurance premiums and mortgage insurance premiums as the agency determines to be reasonable.Section 303-B. Loan terms under program.(a) Length of loans.--The agency may not issue a loan under the program for a period of more than 15 years.(b) Limitation on loans.--The agency may not issue a loan 20250HB0844PN0874 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under the program in excess of 80% of the median sale price of housing for the previous calendar year in the county where the housing unit is to be constructed. The agency shall promulgate rules and regulations to establish the loan limits on an annual basis for each county in accordance with this subsection.(c) Limitation on borrowing.--The agency may set a limit on the maximum borrowing under the program at the discretion of the agency based on perceived need and creditworthiness of the eligible builder or the low-income persons or families and moderate-income persons or families . Section 304-B. Housing Construction Loan Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Housing Construction Loan Fund is established in the State Treasury.(b) Deposits.--The State Treasurer shall deposit all of the following into the fund:(1) Money appropriated by the General Assembly for the program.(2) Money from other grant sources to the agency for the program.(3) Money from the r epayment of principal and interest on loans made under the program.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0844PN0874 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122